Utah statutes.
10-3-601.   Business of governing body conducted only in open meeting.

All meetings of the governing body of each municipality shall be held in compliance with the provisions of Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.



Amended by Chapter 14, 2006 General Session

